Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-6,263
Safety glass; requirements; vehicles built after January 1, 1935; motorcycle windshield; requirements; violation; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful to operate on any highway in this state any motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, manufactured or assembled, whether from a kit or otherwise, after January 1, 1935, which is designed or used for the purpose of carrying passengers unless such vehicle is equipped in all doors, windows, and windshields with safety glass. Any windshield attached to a motorcycle shall be manufactured of products which will successfully withstand discoloration due to exposure to sunlight or abnormal temperatures over an extended period of time.

(2) For purposes of this section, motorcycle does not include an autocycle.

(3) The owner or operator of any motor vehicle operated in violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1933, c. 101, § 2, p. 413;

Laws 1937, c. 145, § 2, p. 554;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-1195;

R.S.1943, § 39-7,101;

Laws 1977, LB 314, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,155;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 359;

Laws 2003, LB 238, § 7;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 103.
April 12, 2018